Nevada, session 83, SB310.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 407 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
governmental agency shall not remove or destroy a monument
that is located on state lands or any other publicly owned land
unless the removal or destruction is approved by the Governor. A
governmental agency may, without approval from the Governor,
relocate a monument that is located on state lands or any other
publicly owned land to a site of similar prominence, honor,
visibility and access.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Governmental agency” means an officer, board,
commission, department, division, bureau, district or any other
unit of government of this State or a local government.
(b) “Monument” means a statue, plaque, memorial or other
structure intended to be permanently displayed and maintained
that:
(1) Has been dedicated in honor of any historic conflict,
historic entity, historic event, historic figure or historic
organization including, without limitation, a historic conflict,
entity, event, figure or organization pertaining to the history of the
Indian tribes in Nevada;
(2) Has been dedicated in honor of a religious or civic
purpose;
(3) Pertains to the history of the settlement of Nevada;
(4) Is listed in the register of historic resources of a
community which is recognized as a Certified Local Government
pursuant to the Certified Local Government Program jointly
administered by the National Park Service and the Office of
Historic Preservation of the Department;
(5) Is listed in the State Register of Historic Places
pursuant to NRS 383.085 or the National Register of Historic
Places; or
-
*SB310*

– 3 –
(6) Has been designated by the Governor as a state
monument pursuant to NRS 407.120.
Sec. 2. Chapter 206 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Unless a greater criminal penalty is provided in NRS
206.330, a person who willfully vandalizes, defaces, destroys or
damages a monument that is located on state lands or any other
publicly owned land is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. In addition
to any other penalty, the court shall order the person to pay
restitution.
2. As used in this section, “monument” means a statue,
plaque, memorial or other structure intended to be permanently
displayed and maintained that:
(a) Has been dedicated in honor of any historic conflict,
historic entity, historic event, historic figure or historic
organization including, without limitation, a historic conflict,
entity, event, figure or organization pertaining to the history of the
Indian tribes in Nevada;
(b) Has been dedicated in honor of a religious or civic
purpose;
(c) Pertains to the history of the settlement of Nevada;
(d) Is listed in the register of historic resources of a community
which is recognized as a Certified Local Government pursuant to
the Certified Local Government Program jointly administered by
the National Park Service and the Office of Historic Preservation
of the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources;
(e) Is listed in the State Register of Historic Places pursuant to
NRS 383.085 or the National Register of Historic Places; or
(f) Has been designated by the Governor as a state monument
pursuant to NRS 407.120.
Sec. 3. NRS 381.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
381.225 1. It is unlawful for any person to commit vandalism
upon any historic or prehistoric sites, natural monuments,
speleological sites and objects of antiquity, or to write or paint or
carve initials or words, or in any other way deface, any of those
objects, Indian paintings or historic buildings.
2. Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS 206.125 or
206.330, or section 2 of this act, a person violating the provisions of
subsection 1 is guilty of a public offense proportionate to the value
of the property damaged or destroyed as set forth in NRS 193.155.
H
-
*SB310*